Alaska, session 34, HB135.
BE IT ENACTED BY THE LEGISLATURE OF THE STATE OF ALASKA: 04 * Section 1. AS 16.51.100 is amended to read: 05 Sec. 16.51.100. Duties of board. The board shall 06 (1) conduct programs of education, research, advertising, or sales 07 promotion designed to accomplish the purposes of this chapter; 08 (2) promote all species of seafood and their by-products that are 09 harvested in the state and processed for sale; 10 (3) develop market-oriented quality specifications for Alaska seafood 11 to be used in developing a high quality image for Alaska seafood in domestic and 12 world markets, and adopt and distribute recommendations regarding the handling of 13 seafood from the moment of capture or harvest to final distribution; 14 (4) prepare market research and product development plans for the 01 promotion of all species of seafood and their by-products that are harvested in the state 02 and processed for sale; 03 (5) submit an annual report to the governor describing the activities of 04 the institute and notify the legislature that the report is available; 05 (6) develop marketing programs based on the "inspection" and 06 "premium quality" seals designed under AS 17.20.066 and use the seals in advertising 07 and promotion efforts of the institute. 08 * Sec. 2. AS 16.51.180(7) is amended to read: 09 (7) "seafood" means finfish, shellfish, and fish by-products, including 10 but not limited to salmon, halibut, herring, flounder, crab, clam, cod, shrimp, [AND] 11 pollock, and [BUT DOES NOT INCLUDE] aquatic farm products as defined in 12 AS 16.40.199. Welcome toThe Alaska State Legislature This web site is the place to track bills, locate and contact your legislators, and access committee information. Questions? Try our help wizard or call 907-465-4648. SMS Bill Tracking Text a bill number (ex: HB1) to 559-245-2529 to enroll in text alerts. You will receive an enrollment confirmation and instructions on how to stop receiving the alerts.